North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 25A. Legislative Commission on Methamphetamine Abuse.

§ 120-226.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-90, s. 8(a), effective July 22, 2021.

History.

2005-434, s. 7; repealed by 2021-90, s. 8(a), effective July 22, 2021.

§§ 120-227 through 120-229.

Reserved for future codification purposes.